Utah statutes.
63B-14-202.   Revenue bond authorizations -- Board of Regents.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of the University of Utah, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the
University of Utah to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
the University of Utah, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to
finance the cost of acquiring, constructing, furnishing, and equipping a west
wing, two levels to the Eccles Critical Care Pavilion, and parking expansion
at the University Hospital;
(b)  hospital revenues be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of
any obligation created under authority of this Subsection (1);
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this
Subsection (1) may provide up to $90,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  funds from the University Hospital Foundation, hospital operations, and
other institutional funds be used to fund the balance of the project costs;
(e)  the University of Utah may plan, design, and construct a west wing and
parking expansion at the University Hospital under the direction of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated; and
(f)  the university may not request state funds for operations and
maintenance.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents, on behalf of Weber State University, may issue,
sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Weber
State University to borrow money on the credit, revenues, and reserves of
Weber State University, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to
finance the cost of renovating the Shepherd Union Building;
(b)  student fees be used as the primary revenue source for repayment of any
obligation created under authority of this Subsection (2);
(c)  the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this
Subsection (2) may provide up to $20,000,000, together with other amounts
necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any
debt service reserve requirements;
(d)  Weber State University may plan, design, and renovate the Shepherd Union
Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
and
(e)  the university may not request state funds for operations and
maintenance.
